Connecticut, session 2026, HB05524.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 22a-226e of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) (1) On and after January 1, 2014, each commercial food wholesaler
or distributor, industrial food manufacturer or processor, supermarket,
resort or conference center that is located not more than twenty miles
from an authorized source-separated organic material composting
facility and that generates an average projected volume of not less than
one hundred four tons per year of source-separated organic materials
shall: (A) Separate such source-separated organic materials from other
solid waste; and (B) ensure that such source-separated organic materials
are recycled at any authorized source-separated organic material
composting facility that has available capacity and that will accept such
source-separated organic material.
(2) On and after January 1, 2020, each commercial food wholesaler or
distributor, industrial food manufacturer or processor, supermarket,
resort or conference center that is located not more than twenty miles
from an authorized source-separated organic material composting
LCO 1 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5524
facility and that generates an average projected volume of not less than
fifty-two tons per year of source-separated organic materials shall: (A)
Separate such source-separated organic materials from other solid
waste; and (B) ensure that such source-separated organic materials are
recycled at any authorized source-separated organic material
composting facility that has available capacity and that will accept such
source-separated organic material.
(3) On and after January 1, 2022, each commercial food wholesaler or
distributor, industrial food manufacturer or processor, supermarket,
resort or conference center that is located not more than twenty miles
from either an authorized source-separated organic material
composting facility or an authorized transfer station, or any collection
location authorized to receive source-separated organic materials, and
that generates an average projected volume of not less than twenty-six
tons per year of source-separated organic materials shall: (A) Separate
such source-separated organic materials from other solid waste; and (B)
ensure that such source-separated organic materials are recycled at any
authorized source-separated organic material composting facility that
has available capacity and that will accept such source-separated
organic material.
(4) On and after January 1, 2025, each commercial food wholesaler or
distributor, industrial food manufacturer or processor, supermarket,
resort, conference center or institution that generates an average
projected volume of not less than twenty-six tons per year of source-
separated organic materials shall: (A) Separate such source-separated
organic materials from other solid waste; and (B) ensure that such
source-separated organic materials are recycled at any authorized
source-separated organic material composting facility that has available
capacity and that will accept such source-separated organic material.
For the purposes of this section "institution" means any establishment
engaged in providing hospitality, entertainment or rehabilitation and
health care services, and any hospital, public or independent institution
of higher education building or facility or correctional facility.
LCO 2 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5524
(5) On and after July 1, 2027, any entity that generates an average
projected volume of not less than twenty-six tons per year of source-
separated organic materials shall: (A) Separate such source-separated
organic materials from other solid waste; and (B) ensure that such
source-separated organic materials are recycled at any authorized
source-separated organic material composting facility that has available
capacity and that will accept such source-separated organic material.
[(5)] (6) On and after July 1, 2026, each public or nonpublic school
building or educational facility in which students in grades
kindergarten to twelve, inclusive, or any combination thereof, are
enrolled, that is located not more than twenty miles from either an
authorized source-separated organic material composting facility and
that generates an average projected volume of not less than twenty-six
tons per year of source-separated organic materials shall: (A) Separate
such source-separated organic materials from other solid waste; and (B)
ensure that such source-separated organic materials are recycled at any
authorized source-separated organic material composting facility that
has available capacity and that will accept such source-separated
organic material.
(b) Any such wholesaler, distributor, manufacturer, processor,
supermarket, institution, resort or conference center that performs
composting of source-separated organic materials on site or treats
source-separated organic materials via on-site organic treatment
equipment permitted pursuant to the general statutes or federal law
shall be deemed in compliance with the provisions of this section.
(c) Any permitted source-separated organic material composting
facility that receives such source-separated organic materials shall
report to the Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection, as
part of such facility's reporting obligations, a summary of fees charged
for receipt of such source-separated organic materials.
(d) Not later than January 1, 2022, the Commissioner of Energy and
Environmental Protection shall establish a voluntary pilot program for
LCO 3 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5524
any municipality that seeks to separate source-separated organic
materials and ensure that such source-separated organic materials are
recycled at authorized source-separated organic material composting
facilities that have available capacity and that will accept such source-
separated organic material.
(e) On or before March 1, 2025, and annually thereafter, each
wholesaler, distributor, manufacturer, processor, supermarket, resort,
conference center or institution that is subject to the provisions of this
section shall submit a report to the Department of Energy and
Environmental Protection in electronic format. Such report shall
summarize such entity's amount of edible food donated, the amount of
food scraps recycled and the organics recycler or recyclers and
associated collectors used. On and after March 1, 2027, and annually
thereafter, such reporting requirement shall apply to any entity that is
subject to the provisions of this section.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2028) (a) No food service establishment,
100 restaurant, dining facility, caterer or other entity engaged in the sale or
101 service of prepared food shall sell, use or provide food service ware
102 composed, in whole or in part, of expanded polystyrene.
103 (b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, a local or regional
104 board of education shall be deemed in compliance with this section if
105 such board participates in a program for the collection and recycling of
106 expanded polystyrene food service ware and ensures that such
107 materials are separated, collected and delivered to a facility authorized
108 to accept and recycle such material.
109 (c) For purposes of this section, "expanded polystyrene" means blown
110 polystyrene or expanded or extruded foam polystyrene.
111 (d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a
112 municipality from adopting or enforcing an ordinance that imposes
113 requirements or restrictions on expanded polystyrene that are stricter
114 than the provisions of this section.
LCO 4 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5524
115 (e) The provisions of this section shall not apply to any packaging
116 product composed of polystyrene or containing polystyrene loose fill
117 that:
118 (1) Is used for prepackaged food that was filled and sealed prior to
119 receipt by a retail establishment, business or food vendor;
120 (2) Is used to contain or store raw or frozen meat or seafood sold from
121 a butcher case or similar retail appliance;
122 (3) Is a cooler or ice chest, provided such polystyrene is fully encased
123 in another material; or
124 (4) Is reusable polystyrene used for agricultural purposes.
125 (f) The provisions of this section shall not be construed to apply to
126 any patient care unit in any hospital or rehabilitation facility.
127 Sec. 3. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2027) (a) On and after January 1, 2028,
128 no food service establishment shall provide single-use food service
129 items, including utensils, napkins, condiment packets or drinking
130 straws, except upon request of the customer or through the use of a
131 utensil dispenser.
132 (b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the provision
133 or use of drinking straws, provided no single-use drinking straw
134 provided by a food service establishment shall contain PFAS, as defined
135 in section 22a-255h of the general statutes, that is intentionally added.
136 For purposes of this subsection, "PFAS that is intentionally added"
137 means the addition of PFAS during the manufacturing process to
138 provide a functional or technical effect in the finished product.
139 Sec. 4. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) On and after July 1, 2027, any
140 entity subject to the commercial organics diversion requirements of
141 section 22a-226e of the general statutes, as amended by this act, shall
142 prioritize the donation of surplus edible food for human consumption
143 prior to the use of recycling, composting, aerobic digestion, anaerobic
144 digestion or disposal and shall adopt and maintain a written policy
LCO 5 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5524
145 establishing procedures for the safe storage, handling and transfer of
146 such food for donation.
147 Sec. 5. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) Notwithstanding any provision
148 of title 22a of the general statutes, for purposes of any municipal or
149 regional materials management grant program administered by the
150 Department of Energy and Environmental Protection, including, but not
151 limited to, materials management infrastructure or sustainable
152 materials management grant programs, eligible project costs may
153 include equipment, infrastructure, facility improvements,
154 implementation systems and operational components necessary to
155 support waste reduction, reuse programs, food recovery, source
156 separation, organics diversion or materials processing, including, but
157 not limited to, storage infrastructure, cold storage equipment, reusable
158 food service systems, dishwashing equipment, sanitation infrastructure,
159 sorting systems and collection systems.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 22a-226e
Sec. 2 July 1, 2028 New section
Sec. 3 July 1, 2027 New section
Sec. 4 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 5 July 1, 2026 New section
ENV Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 6 of 6